src/fst/test/dict-gt-yamls/V-unimorphstuff_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
    akkõ+V+Cond+ConNeg+Sg: akkõks
    akkõ+V+Act+Cond+ConNeg+Pl1: akkõksmõ
    akkõ+V+Act+Cond+ConNeg+Pl2: akkõkstõ
    akkõ+V+Act+Cond+ConNeg+Pl3: akkõkstõ
    akkõ+V+Act+Imprt+Sg2: ak
    akkõ+V+Act+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg2: ak
    akkõ+V+Act+Imprt+Pl2: akkõgid
    akkõ+V+Act+Imprt+ConNeg+Pl2: akkõgid
    akkõ+V+Act+Imprt+Sg: akkõg
    akkõ+V+Act+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg: akkõg
    akkõ+V+Act+Imprt+Pl: akkõgõd
    akkõ+V+Act+Imprt+ConNeg+Pl: akkõgõd
    akkõ+V+Act+Quo+ConNeg+Sg: akkiji
    akkõ+V+Act+Quo+Pl: akkijid
    akkõ+V+Act+Quo+ConNeg+Pl: akkijid
    akkõ+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg: akkõn
    akkõ+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl: akkõnd
    akkõ+V+Pss+PrfPrc: aktõd
    akkõ+V+Pss+PrfPrc: aktõb
    alāntõ+V+Inf: alāntõ
    alāntõ+V+Ger: alāntõs
    alāntõ+V+Sup: alāntõm
    alāntõ+V+Sup+Ela: alāntõmõst
    alāntõ+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: alāntõb
    alāntõ+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: alāntõd
    alāntõ+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: alāntõb
    alāntõ+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: alāntõm
    alāntõ+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2: alāntõt
    alāntõ+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: alāntõbõd
    alāntõ+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: alāntiz
    alāntõ+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: alāntizt
    alāntõ+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: alāntiz
    alāntõ+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: alāntizmõ
    alāntõ+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [alāntizt, alāntiztõ]
    alāntõ+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [alāntizt, alāntiztõ]
    alāntõ+V+Act+Ind+ConNeg+Sg: alānt
    alāntõ+V+Act+Ind+ConNeg+Pl1: alāntõm
    alāntõ+V+Act+Ind+ConNeg+Pl2: alāntõt
    alāntõ+V+Act+Ind+ConNeg+Pl3: alāntõt
    alāntõ+V+Act+Cond+Sg1: alāntõks
    alāntõ+V+Act+Cond+Sg2: alāntõkst
    alāntõ+V+Act+Cond+Sg3: alāntõks
    alāntõ+V+Act+Cond+Pl1: alāntõksmõ
    alāntõ+V+Act+Cond+Pl2: alāntõkstõ
    alāntõ+V+Act+Cond+Pl3: alāntõkstõ
    alāntõ+V+Cond+ConNeg+Sg: alāntõks
    alāntõ+V+Act+Cond+ConNeg+Pl1: alāntõksmõ
    alāntõ+V+Act+Cond+ConNeg+Pl2: alāntõkstõ
    alāntõ+V+Act+Cond+ConNeg+Pl3: alāntõkstõ
    alāntõ+V+Act+Imprt+Sg2: alānt
    alāntõ+V+Act+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg2: alānt
    alāntõ+V+Act+Imprt+Pl2: alāntõgid
    alāntõ+V+Act+Imprt+ConNeg+Pl2: alāntõgid
    alāntõ+V+Act+Imprt+Sg: alāntõg
    alāntõ+V+Act+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg: alāntõg
    alāntõ+V+Act+Imprt+Pl: alāntõgõd
    alāntõ+V+Act+Imprt+ConNeg+Pl: alāntõgõd
    alāntõ+V+Act+Quo+ConNeg+Sg: alāntiji
    alāntõ+V+Act+Quo+Pl: alāntijid
    alāntõ+V+Act+Quo+ConNeg+Pl: alāntijid
    alāntõ+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg: alāntõn
    alāntõ+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl: alāntõnd
    alāntõ+V+Pss+PrfPrc: alāntõd
    alāntõ+V+Pss+PrfPrc: alāntõb
    alāntõ+V+Inf: alāntõ
    alāntõ+V+Ger: alāntõs
    alāntõ+V+Sup: alāntõm
    alāntõ+V+Sup+Ela: alāntõmõst
    alāntõ+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: alāntõb
    alāntõ+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: alāntõd
    alāntõ+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: alāntõb
    alāntõ+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: alāntõm
    alāntõ+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2: alāntõt
    alāntõ+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: alāntõbõd
    alāntõ+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: alāntiz
    alāntõ+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: alāntizt
    alāntõ+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: alāntiz
    alāntõ+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: alāntizmõ
    alāntõ+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [alāntizt, alāntiztõ]
    alāntõ+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [alāntizt, alāntiztõ]
    alāntõ+V+Act+Ind+ConNeg+Sg: alānt
    alāntõ+V+Act+Ind+ConNeg+Pl1: alāntõm
    alāntõ+V+Act+Ind+ConNeg+Pl2: alāntõt
    alāntõ+V+Act+Ind+ConNeg+Pl3: alāntõt
    alāntõ+V+Act+Cond+Sg1: alāntõks
    alāntõ+V+Act+Cond+Sg2: alāntõkst
    alāntõ+V+Act+Cond+Sg3: alāntõks
    alāntõ+V+Act+Cond+Pl1: alāntõksmõ
    alāntõ+V+Act+Cond+Pl2: alāntõkstõ
    alāntõ+V+Act+Cond+Pl3: alāntõkstõ
    alāntõ+V+Cond+ConNeg+Sg: alāntõks
    alāntõ+V+Act+Cond+ConNeg+Pl1: alāntõksmõ
    alāntõ+V+Act+Cond+ConNeg+Pl2: alāntõkstõ
    alāntõ+V+Act+Cond+ConNeg+Pl3: alāntõkstõ
    alāntõ+V+Act+Imprt+Sg2: alānt
    alāntõ+V+Act+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg2: alānt
    alāntõ+V+Act+Imprt+Pl2: alāntõgid
    alāntõ+V+Act+Imprt+ConNeg+Pl2: alāntõgid
    alāntõ+V+Act+Imprt+Sg: alāntõg
    alāntõ+V+Act+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg: alāntõg
    alāntõ+V+Act+Imprt+Pl: alāntõgõd
    alāntõ+V+Act+Imprt+ConNeg+Pl: alāntõgõd
    alāntõ+V+Act+Quo+ConNeg+Sg: alāntiji
    alāntõ+V+Act+Quo+Pl: alāntijid
    alāntõ+V+Act+Quo+ConNeg+Pl: alāntijid
    alāntõ+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg: alāntõn
    alāntõ+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl: alāntõnd
    alāntõ+V+Pss+PrfPrc: alāntõd
    alāntõ+V+Pss+PrfPrc: alāntõb
    alāstõ+V+Inf: alāstõ
    alāstõ+V+Ger: alāstõs
    alāstõ+V+Sup: alāstõm
    alāstõ+V+Sup+Ela: alāstõmõst
    alāstõ+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: alāstõb
    alāstõ+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: alāstõd
    alāstõ+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: alāstõb
    alāstõ+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: alāstõm
    alāstõ+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2: alāstõt
    alāstõ+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: alāstõbõd
    alāstõ+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: alāstiz
    alāstõ+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: alāstizt
    alāstõ+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: alāstiz
    alāstõ+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: alāstizmõ
    alāstõ+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [alāstizt, alāstiztõ]
    alāstõ+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [alāstizt, alāstiztõ]
    alāstõ+V+Act+Ind+ConNeg+Sg: alāst
    alāstõ+V+Act+Ind+ConNeg+Pl1: alāstõm
    alāstõ+V+Act+Ind+ConNeg+Pl2: alāstõt
    alāstõ+V+Act+Ind+ConNeg+Pl3: alāstõt
    alāstõ+V+Act+Cond+Sg1: alāstõks
    alāstõ+V+Act+Cond+Sg2: alāstõkst
    alāstõ+V+Act+Cond+Sg3: alāstõks
    alāstõ+V+Act+Cond+Pl1: alāstõksmõ
    alāstõ+V+Act+Cond+Pl2: alāstõkstõ
    alāstõ+V+Act+Cond+Pl3: alāstõkstõ
    alāstõ+V+Cond+ConNeg+Sg: alāstõks
    alāstõ+V+Act+Cond+ConNeg+Pl1: alāstõksmõ
    alāstõ+V+Act+Cond+ConNeg+Pl2: alāstõkstõ
    alāstõ+V+Act+Cond+ConNeg+Pl3: alāstõkstõ
    alāstõ+V+Act+Imprt+Sg2: alāst
    alāstõ+V+Act+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg2: alāst
    alāstõ+V+Act+Imprt+Pl2: alāstõgid
    alāstõ+V+Act+Imprt+ConNeg+Pl2: alāstõgid
    alāstõ+V+Act+Imprt+Sg: alāstõg
    alāstõ+V+Act+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg: alāstõg
    alāstõ+V+Act+Imprt+Pl: alāstõgõd
    alāstõ+V+Act+Imprt+ConNeg+Pl: alāstõgõd
    alāstõ+V+Act+Quo+ConNeg+Sg: alāstiji
    alāstõ+V+Act+Quo+Pl: alāstijid
    alāstõ+V+Act+Quo+ConNeg+Pl: alāstijid
    alāstõ+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg: alāstõn
    alāstõ+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl: alāstõnd
    alāstõ+V+Pss+PrfPrc: alāstõd
    alāstõ+V+Pss+PrfPrc: alāstõb
    algtõ+V+Inf: aʼlgtõ
    algtõ+V+Ger: aʼlgtõs
    algtõ+V+Sup: aʼlgtõm
    algtõ+V+Sup+Ela: aʼlgtõmõst
    algtõ+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: aʼlgtõb
    algtõ+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: aʼlgtõd
    algtõ+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: aʼlgtõb
    algtõ+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: aʼlgtõm
    algtõ+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2: aʼlgtõt
    algtõ+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: aʼlgtõbõd
    algtõ+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: aʼlgtiz
    algtõ+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: aʼlgtizt
    algtõ+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: aʼlgtiz
    algtõ+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: aʼlgtizmõ
    algtõ+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [aʼlgtizt, aʼlgtiztõ]
    algtõ+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [aʼlgtizt, aʼlgtiztõ]
    algtõ+V+Act+Ind+ConNeg+Sg: aʼlgt
    algtõ+V+Act+Ind+ConNeg+Pl1: aʼlgtõm
    algtõ+V+Act+Ind+ConNeg+Pl2: aʼlgtõt
    algtõ+V+Act+Ind+ConNeg+Pl3: aʼlgtõt
    algtõ+V+Act+Cond+Sg1: aʼlgtõks
    algtõ+V+Act+Cond+Sg2: aʼlgtõkst
    algtõ+V+Act+Cond+Sg3: aʼlgtõks
    algtõ+V+Act+Cond+Pl1: aʼlgtõksmõ
    algtõ+V+Act+Cond+Pl2: aʼlgtõkstõ
    algtõ+V+Act+Cond+Pl3: aʼlgtõkstõ
    algtõ+V+Cond+ConNeg+Sg: aʼlgtõks
    algtõ+V+Act+Cond+ConNeg+Pl1: aʼlgtõksmõ
    algtõ+V+Act+Cond+ConNeg+Pl2: aʼlgtõkstõ
    algtõ+V+Act+Cond+ConNeg+Pl3: aʼlgtõkstõ
    algtõ+V+Act+Imprt+Sg2: aʼlgt
    algtõ+V+Act+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg2: aʼlgt
    algtõ+V+Act+Imprt+Pl2: aʼlgtõgid
    algtõ+V+Act+Imprt+ConNeg+Pl2: aʼlgtõgid
    algtõ+V+Act+Imprt+Sg: aʼlgtõg
    algtõ+V+Act+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg: aʼlgtõg
    algtõ+V+Act+Imprt+Pl: aʼlgtõgõd
    algtõ+V+Act+Imprt+ConNeg+Pl: aʼlgtõgõd
    algtõ+V+Act+Quo+ConNeg+Sg: aʼlgtiji
    algtõ+V+Act+Quo+Pl: aʼlgtijid
    algtõ+V+Act+Quo+ConNeg+Pl: aʼlgtijid
    algtõ+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg: aʼlgtõn
    algtõ+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl: aʼlgtõnd
    algtõ+V+Pss+PrfPrc: aʼlgtõd
    algtõ+V+Pss+PrfPrc: aʼlgtõb
    alīztõ+V+Inf: alīztõ
    alīztõ+V+Ger: alīztõs
    alīztõ+V+Sup: alīztõm
    alīztõ+V+Sup+Ela: alīztõmõst
    alīztõ+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: alīztõb
    alīztõ+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: alīztõd
    alīztõ+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: alīztõb
    alīztõ+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: alīztõm
    alīztõ+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2: alīztõt
    alīztõ+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: alīztõbõd
    alīztõ+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: alīztiz
    alīztõ+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: alīztizt
    alīztõ+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: alīztiz
    alīztõ+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: alīztizmõ
    alīztõ+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [alīztizt, alīztiztõ]
    alīztõ+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [alīztizt, alīztiztõ]
    alīztõ+V+Act+Ind+ConNeg+Sg: alīzt
    alīztõ+V+Act+Ind+ConNeg+Pl1: alīztõm
    alīztõ+V+Act+Ind+ConNeg+Pl2: alīztõt
    alīztõ+V+Act+Ind+ConNeg+Pl3: alīztõt
    alīztõ+V+Act+Cond+Sg1: alīztõks
    alīztõ+V+Act+Cond+Sg2: alīztõkst
    alīztõ+V+Act+Cond+Sg3: alīztõks
    alīztõ+V+Act+Cond+Pl1: alīztõksmõ
    alīztõ+V+Act+Cond+Pl2: alīztõkstõ
    alīztõ+V+Act+Cond+Pl3: alīztõkstõ
    alīztõ+V+Cond+ConNeg+Sg: alīztõks
    alīztõ+V+Act+Cond+ConNeg+Pl1: alīztõksmõ
    alīztõ+V+Act+Cond+ConNeg+Pl2: alīztõkstõ
    alīztõ+V+Act+Cond+ConNeg+Pl3: alīztõkstõ
    alīztõ+V+Act+Imprt+Sg2: alīzt
    alīztõ+V+Act+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg2: alīzt
    alīztõ+V+Act+Imprt+Pl2: alīztõgid
    alīztõ+V+Act+Imprt+ConNeg+Pl2: alīztõgid
    alīztõ+V+Act+Imprt+Sg: alīztõg
    alīztõ+V+Act+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg: alīztõg
    alīztõ+V+Act+Imprt+Pl: alīztõgõd
    alīztõ+V+Act+Imprt+ConNeg+Pl: alīztõgõd
    alīztõ+V+Act+Quo+ConNeg+Sg: alīztiji
    alīztõ+V+Act+Quo+Pl: alīztijid
    alīztõ+V+Act+Quo+ConNeg+Pl: alīztijid
    alīztõ+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg: alīztõn
    alīztõ+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl: alīztõnd
    alīztõ+V+Pss+PrfPrc: alīztõd
    alīztõ+V+Pss+PrfPrc: alīztõb
    alīztõ+V+Inf: alīztõ
    alīztõ+V+Ger: alīztõs
    alīztõ+V+Sup: alīztõm
    alīztõ+V+Sup+Ela: alīztõmõst
    alīztõ+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: alīztõb
    alīztõ+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: alīztõd
    alīztõ+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: alīztõb
    alīztõ+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: alīztõm
    alīztõ+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2: alīztõt
    alīztõ+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: alīztõbõd
    alīztõ+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: alīztiz
    alīztõ+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: alīztizt
    alīztõ+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: alīztiz
    alīztõ+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: alīztizmõ
    alīztõ+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [alīztizt, alīztiztõ]
    alīztõ+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [alīztizt, alīztiztõ]
    alīztõ+V+Act+Ind+ConNeg+Sg: alīzt
    alīztõ+V+Act+Ind+ConNeg+Pl1: alīztõm
    alīztõ+V+Act+Ind+ConNeg+Pl2: alīztõt
    alīztõ+V+Act+Ind+ConNeg+Pl3: alīztõt
    alīztõ+V+Act+Cond+Sg1: alīztõks
    alīztõ+V+Act+Cond+Sg2: alīztõkst
    alīztõ+V+Act+Cond+Sg3: alīztõks
    alīztõ+V+Act+Cond+Pl1: alīztõksmõ
    alīztõ+V+Act+Cond+Pl2: alīztõkstõ
    alīztõ+V+Act+Cond+Pl3: alīztõkstõ
    alīztõ+V+Cond+ConNeg+Sg: alīztõks
    alīztõ+V+Act+Cond+ConNeg+Pl1: alīztõksmõ
    alīztõ+V+Act+Cond+ConNeg+Pl2: alīztõkstõ
    alīztõ+V+Act+Cond+ConNeg+Pl3: alīztõkstõ
    alīztõ+V+Act+Imprt+Sg2: alīzt
    alīztõ+V+Act+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg2: alīzt
    alīztõ+V+Act+Imprt+Pl2: alīztõgid
    alīztõ+V+Act+Imprt+ConNeg+Pl2: alīztõgid
    alīztõ+V+Act+Imprt+Sg: alīztõg
    alīztõ+V+Act+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg: alīztõg
    alīztõ+V+Act+Imprt+Pl: alīztõgõd
    alīztõ+V+Act+Imprt+ConNeg+Pl: alīztõgõd
    alīztõ+V+Act+Quo+ConNeg+Sg: alīztiji
    alīztõ+V+Act+Quo+Pl: alīztijid
    alīztõ+V+Act+Quo+ConNeg+Pl: alīztijid
    alīztõ+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg: alīztõn
    alīztõ+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl: alīztõnd
    alīztõ+V+Pss+PrfPrc: alīztõd
    alīztõ+V+Pss+PrfPrc: alīztõb
    almõldõ+V+Inf: aʼlmõldõ
    almõldõ+V+Ger: aʼlmõldõs
    almõldõ+V+Sup: aʼlmõldõm
    almõldõ+V+Sup+Ela: aʼlmõldõmõst
    almõldõ+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: aʼlmõldõb
    almõldõ+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: aʼlmõldõd
    almõldõ+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: aʼlmõldõb
    almõldõ+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: aʼlmõldõm
    almõldõ+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2: aʼlmõldõt
    almõldõ+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: aʼlmõldõbõd
    almõldõ+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: aʼlmõldiz
    almõldõ+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: aʼlmõldizt
    almõldõ+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: aʼlmõldiz
    almõldõ+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: aʼlmõldizmõ
    almõldõ+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [aʼlmõldizt, aʼlmõldiztõ]
    almõldõ+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [aʼlmõldizt, aʼlmõldiztõ]
    almõldõ+V+Act+Ind+ConNeg+Sg: aʼlmõld
    almõldõ+V+Act+Ind+ConNeg+Pl1: aʼlmõldõm
    almõldõ+V+Act+Ind+ConNeg+Pl2: aʼlmõldõt
    almõldõ+V+Act+Ind+ConNeg+Pl3: aʼlmõldõt
    almõldõ+V+Act+Cond+Sg1: aʼlmõldõks
    almõldõ+V+Act+Cond+Sg2: aʼlmõldõkst
    almõldõ+V+Act+Cond+Sg3: aʼlmõldõks
    almõldõ+V+Act+Cond+Pl1: aʼlmõldõksmõ
